apertium-scn.scn.dix
    <pardef n="risp/ùnniri__vblex">
      	<e><p><l>ùnniri</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>unniri</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      	<e><p><l>ùnniri</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>unniri</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>

    	<e><p><l>unnu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unni</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unni</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unnemu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unniti</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ùnninu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>unninu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>unnunu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ùnnunu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	<e><p><l>unni</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unnissi</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unnemu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unniti</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>unìssiru</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>unissiru</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        
    	<e><p><l>ùnni</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>unnìssi</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>unnèmu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>unnìti</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
        <e><p><l>unìssiru</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
        
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unni</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnissi</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnemu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unniti</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>unissiru</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>

    	<e><p><l>usi</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unisti</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>usi</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ùsimu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>usimu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unnìstivu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnistivu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ùsiru</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>usiru</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


    	 <!-- Imperfecto de Indicativo -->
    	<e><p><l>unnìa</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnia</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unnivi</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unnìa</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnia</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unnìamu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unniamu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unnìavu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unniavu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>unnìanu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnianu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	 <!-- Two alternative forms: with "eva" and with "iva". Forms without accent accepted.  -->
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unneva</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unniva</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnevi</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnivi</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unneva</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unniva</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnèvamu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnìvamu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnèvavu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnìvavu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnèvanu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnìvanu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnevamu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnivamu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnevavu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnivavu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnevanu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnivanu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


    	 <!-- Futuro Simple -->
    	<e><p><l>unnirò</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnirrò</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unnirai</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnirrai</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unnirà</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnirrà</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unniremu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unnirremu</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unniriti</l><r>ùnniri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="arrispùnniri"><i>arrisp</i><par n="risp/ùnniri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rispùnniri"><par n="ri/re"/><i>sp</i><par n="risp/ùnniri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="currispùnniri"><i>currisp</i><par n="risp/ùnniri__vblex"/></e>
